Utah statutes.
17-36-51.   Establishment of tax stability and trust fund -- Increase in tax
levy.
(1) (a)  Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in statute, the
legislative body of any county may by ordinance establish and maintain a tax
stability and trust fund, for the purpose of preserving funds during years
with favorable tax revenues for use during years with less favorable tax
revenues.
(b)  Each fund under Subsection (1)(a) shall be subject to all of the
limitations and restrictions imposed by this section and Sections 17-36-52 and
17-36-53.
(c)  The principal of the fund shall consist of all sums transferred to it in
accordance with Subsection (2) and interest or other income retained in the
fund under Subsection 17-36-52(2).
(2)  After establishing a tax stability and trust fund as provided in
Subsection (1), the legislative body, in establishing the levy for the
property tax levied by the county under Section 59-2-908, may establish the
levy at a level not to exceed .0001 per dollar of taxable value of taxable
property increase per year that will permit the county to receive during that
fiscal year sums in excess of what may be required to provide for the purposes
of the county.  Any excess sums so received are to be transferred from the
General Fund of the county into the tax stability and trust fund.
